DCM_ZAP_GRAMMAR/zap1.lexc
#Project Developed By David Cabestany

Multichar_Symbols [1P] [2P] [3P] [SG] [PL] [DURATIVE] [PAST] [PRES] [HEARSAY] @U.3P.ON@ @U.3P.OFF@ @U.DURATIVE.ON@	@U.DURATIVE.OFF@ @U.HEARSAY.ON@ @U.HEARSAY.OFF@		
 
LEXICON Root
	Prefix;

LEXICON Prefix
	@U.HEARSAY.ON@:@U.HEARSAY.ON@bla+ 		DurativePrefix;
	@U.HEARSAY.OFF@		  					DurativePrefix;
	
LEXICON DurativePrefix
	@U.DURATIVE.ON@:@U.DURATIVE.ON@maa+ 	3PPrefix;
	@U.DURATIVE.OFF@		  				3PPrefix;

LEXICON 3PPrefix
	@U.3P.ON@:@U.3P.ON@s+ 					Verb;
	@U.3P.OFF@		  						Verb;
	
LEXICON Verb
	kata V;									!to lie
	lupo V;									!to drink
	pele V;									!to play soccer
	sape V;									!to run

LEXICON V
	[V]:0									Vtense;

LEXICON	Vtense
	[PRES]:0								Durative1;
	[PAST]:+n								Durative1;
	[INF]:0									Durative2;

LEXICON Durative1
	@U.DURATIVE.ON@							Durative;
	@U.DURATIVE.OFF@						Vinfl;

LEXICON Durative2
	@U.DURATIVE.OFF@						Vinfl2;

LEXICON Durative
	[DURATIVE]:0							Vinfl;

LEXICON Vinfl
	@U.3P.ON@								Vpers3;
	@U.3P.OFF@								Vpers;

LEXICON Vinfl2
	@U.3P.OFF@								Hearsay;

LEXICON	Vpers
	[1P]:+tI								Vnumber;
	[2P]:+kE								Vnumber;
	
LEXICON Vpers3
	[3P]:0									Vnumber;

LEXICON	Vnumber
	[SG]:0									Hearsay;
	[PL]:+s									Hearsay;
	
LEXICON Hearsay

	@U.HEARSAY.OFF@ #;
	@U.HEARSAY.ON@[HEARSAY]:@U.HEARSAY.ON@+bla 	#;
